Utah statutes.
31A-22-513.   Grace period.
(1) (a)  Every group life insurance policy shall contain a provision that the
policyholder is entitled to a grace period of not less than 31 days for the
payment of any premium due except the first payment of premium.
(b)  During the grace period described in Subsection (1)(a) the death benefit
coverage continues in force, unless the policyholder gives the insurer written
notice of discontinuance:
(i)  in advance of the date of discontinuance; and
(ii)  in accordance with the policy terms.
(2)  The policy may require the policyholder to pay the pro rata premium for
the time the policy is in force during the grace period.
